Maine, session 132, LD1336.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-K, sub-§10-B is enacted to read:
10-B.
State Maine-Aomori Sister-state Advisory Not Authorized 10 MRSA
Government Council §31
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA c. 1-C is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 1-C
MAINE-AOMORI SISTER-STATE ADVISORY COUNCIL
§31. Maine-Aomori Sister-state Advisory Council
The Maine-Aomori Sister-state Advisory Council, referred to in this chapter as "the
council," is established by Title 5, section 12004-K, subsection 10-B to promote and
cultivate a cooperative sister-state relationship between this State and the Prefecture of
Aomori, Japan in order to benefit the citizens of the sister states.
1. Members; terms. The council consists of the president of the Maine International
Trade Center, established pursuant to section 945, or the president's designee and 11
members who are appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor, including:
A. One member with knowledge and experience in kindergarten to grade 12 education;
B. One member with knowledge and experience in public postsecondary education;
C. One member with knowledge and experience in private postsecondary education;
D. One member with knowledge and experience in business and international trade;
E. One member with knowledge and experience in the humanities, including
performing or visual arts;
Page 1 - 132LR0871(06)

F. One member with knowledge and experience in the sciences, including natural
resources;
G. One member with knowledge and experience in tourism;
H. One member representing a nonprofit corporation based in the State supporting the
Maine-Aomori cooperative sister-state relationship;
I. One member with knowledge and experience in international exchanges; and
J. Two members representing the general public.
Appointed members of the council serve 3-year terms.
2. Chair; meetings; compensation. The chair of the council, who is elected by the
members of the council, shall preside at, set the agenda for and schedule council meetings.
The council shall meet at least 3 times per year. Meetings must be open to the public.
Members of the council serve without compensation.
3. Duties. The council serves in an advisory capacity and has the following duties.
A. The council shall identify and assess existing activities and exchanges with the
Prefecture of Aomori and devise strategies to develop cultural, educational and
commercial opportunities between the sister states.
B. The council shall identify sources of support for sister-state exchanges, programs,
projects and administrative assistance for the council. The council may seek and accept
in-kind support from outside sources and funding from outside sources to fully fund its
operations.
4. Report. The council shall submit a report to the Governor and the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over economic development matters by
February 1, 2026 and annually thereafter regarding the activities of the council during the
preceding calendar year. The report must include recommendations as determined
appropriate by the council to effectuate its purpose under this section. After reviewing the
report under this subsection, the joint standing committee may report out legislation
relating to the report.
5. Official contact. The president of the Maine International Trade Center, or the
president's designee, shall serve as the official Maine contact for the Maine-Aomori
cooperative sister-state relationship.
Sec. 3. Staggered terms. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 10,
section 31, subsection 1, of the initial appointed members of the Maine-Aomori Sister-state
Advisory Council, 4 members serve one-year terms, 4 members serve 2-year terms and 3
members serve 3-year terms.
Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine-Aomori Sister-state Advisory Council N558
Initiative: Provides base allocations to authorize expenditures for funds received from
outside sources to support the Maine-Aomori Sister-state Advisory Council.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 2 - 132LR0871(06)

All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 3 - 132LR0871(06)